Skip Global State Navigation Maine.gov State Agencies | Web Policies | My Maine.gov | Email this page __________________ Go! [rank.gif] Back to MEPP Home Page If you wish to download this Report, click here (rankrept.zip, 228KB) The file is in MS Word format.
Table of Contents
* Transmittal to the Governor * Steering Committee and staff * Foreword * Acknowledgments * Introduction + The Maine Environmental Priorities Project + Overview of Phase I Work o Creation of an issues List o Compilation of Available Scientific Information o Public Involvement Activities o Steering Committee Ranking Process o Critical Assumptions and Limitations in the Ranking Process + Next Steps - Phase II * Integrated Ranking of Issue Areas * Drinking Water and Domestic Use Water * Freshwater and Marine Ecosystems * Indoor Air * Outdoor Air * Surface Waters and Sediments * Terrestrial Ecosystems * Global Climate Change * Land and Agricultural Resources * Solid, Special and Hazardous Waste * Stratospheric Ozone Depletion * Ground Water * Radiation * Exposure to Toxins in the Work Place * Food Safety * Patterns of Development (Maine's Built and Natural Landscape) * Terms and Abbreviations
[meppbw.gif]
To: The Honorable Angus S. King, Governor, State of Maine
From: Maine Environmental Priorities Project Steering Committee
CONSENSUS RANKING OF ENVIRONMENTAL RISKS FACING MAINE
The Steering Committee is pleased to present you with this Risk Ranking Report of the Maine Environmental Priorities Project (MEPP).
This report expresses the consensus agreements and viewpoints of our diverse Committee about the degree of risk posed by Maine's environmental problems.
The risk Ranking Report is the culmination of Phase I, and represents thousands of hours of work by the Steering Committee and many volunteers.
As you know, the idea for this project first emerged at an ECO/ECO conference held at the College of the Atlantic in 1990 where Maine's business and environmental leaders, commissioners of natural resource departments and policy experts recognized the need for a more thoughtful, proactive, long term, cost effective environmental management program for our state.
The group adopted a model developed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency called Comparative Risk Analysis.
After two years of planning, the Maine Environmental Priorities Project was initiated through Executive Order in May 1993.
The 37-member Steering Committee represents various state agencies, state legislature, business community, environmental organizations, public interest groups, municipal and tribal entities, and academic institutions.
We have held 38 meetings and many of the Steering Committee members attended public meetings and technical work group sessions as well as served on the Technical Work Group Subcommittee or the Public Involvement Subcommittee.
MEPP has studied Maine's environmental problems from the perspective of the risk they pose to human health, ecosystems and the quality of life.
In these efforts we have been assisted by three technical work groups and received a significant input from the public.
You have seen the extensive reports from the three Technical Work Groups.
These volumes represent the first comprehensive look at the risks to Maine's environment.
The Public Involvement activities include other important contributions to this Project: the largest public survey (over 900 Maine citizens) on Maine's environment ever undertaken; and "Stakeholder" and Citizen roundtables and focus groups, involving another 750 Maine citizens.
MEPP has been very careful to consider both science and public values, knowing that, by doing so, we benefit from a broad range of perspectives in addition to increasing the likelihood of public support for improved policies.
This fall, having studied all the reports and public input, the Steering Committee assembled for three days of comparative risk ranking.
We looked at all of Maine's various environmental problems and ranked them High, Medium, and Low.
The enclosed Ranking Report details our decisions and summarizes the data and our rationale for the rankings.
The Steering Committee's conclusion that there are a number of "high" environmental risks facing Maine is quite consistent with the extensive survey of public opinion conducted early in this Project.
The survey showed that Maine people, from all walks of life and all parts of the state, showed a "high" degree of concern over a number of environmental issues facing Maine.
We believe the Risk Ranking Report builds a foundation upon which to develop improved approaches to risk reduction.
Even though this effort is not perfect, due to limitations of personnel, data, time and finances, we believe the report is a strong first step by all Stakeholders toward collaboration for improved environmental risk management.
MEPP has become a unique private/public partnership that is now serving as a national model for consensus-based comparative risk ranking projects.
Of the 20 state projects that have taken place, Maine's is viewed as one of the most productive and with some of the best prospects for long term success in developing prioritized risk reduction management strategies.
With State Government's support to use our Ranking Report to set priorities, we hope that Maine can also become a national leader in developing collaborative efforts to reduce environmental risk.
In the months ahead, we look forward to working with you, your Cabinet and the Legislature in the development and implementation of Phase II.
The MEPP Steering Committee recognizes your personal involvement at the inception of the project, your support for it during your campaign, and continued confidence in MEPP as Governor.
Members of your Administration have participated on the Steering Committee enthusiastically and creatively.
We thank you for your help.
Now we ask for a commitment on the part of State Government to use our work as you set the environmental priorities and follow through on solutions to these issues.
Again, thank you for your support and we look forward to serving Maine in the future.
Steering Committee Members and Staff
Back to Table of Contents
Current Steering Committee Members
Patricia Aho Executive Director, Maine Petroleum Association
John Banks Director, Department of Natural Resources, Penobscot Nation
Daniel Boxer Attorney, Portland
Kenneth Cline Sierra Club (Maine Group)
Charles S. Colgan Muskie Institute of Public Affairs, University of Southern Maine
Albert Curran CEO, Woodard 
John Dieffenbacher-Krall Toxics Coordinator, Maine People's Alliance
Charles Gadzik (appointed 1/94) Director, Maine Forest Service
Kevin Gildart Assistant to the President, Bath Iron Works
Lani Graham, M.D. Former Director, Bureau of Health, Department of Human Services
Christopher J. Hall Vice President, Maine Chamber and Business Alliance
Philip Harriman State Senator, Yarmouth
Marquita Hill Cooperating Professor, Department of Chemical Engineering, University of Maine
Jan Hitchcock Assistant Professor, Lewiston-Auburn College, USM
Marilyn Hotch Attorney, Rockland
Sherry F. Huber Former Executive Director, Maine Waste Management Agency
Fred Hurley Director, Bureau of Resource Management, Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife
Jeffrey Kaelin (appointed 1/94) Executive Director, Maine Sardine Council
Theodore Koffman ECO/ECO Coordinator, College of the Atlantic
Carol Kontos (appointed 10/95)* State Representative, Windham
Ronald Kreisman Former General Counsel, Natural Resources Council of Maine
Ronald Lovaglio (appointed 4/95)* Commissioner, Department of Conservation
Paul Merrill (appointed 1/94) President, Merrill Industries, Inc.
Mason Morfit Vice President, The Nature Conservancy/Maine Chapter
Laurel Nelson (appointed 3/95) President, Paper Industry Information Office
Jon Olson (appointed 4/95) Executive Secretary, Maine Farm Bureau
David Ott (appointed 10/95)* State Representative, York
Pamela Person Coalition for Sensible Energy
Evan Richert (appointed 4/95) Director, State Planning Office
Richard Ruhlin (appointed 10/95)* State Senator, Brewer
Edward Sullivan (appointed 4/95) Commissioner, Department of Environmental Protection
John Tewhey President, Tewhey Associates
Karin Tilberg Attorney, Hallowell
Meredith Tipton Director, Public Health Division, City of Portland
Thomas Urquhart Executive Director, Maine Audubon Society
William Vail (appointed 4/95) Executive Director, Maine Forest Products Council
* Did not participate in ranking.
Past Steering Committee Members
Stephen J. Adams (to 3/95) Former Director, State Planning Office
Richard Bennett (to 12/94) Former State Representative, Norway
David Boulter (to 11/94) Former Director, Land Use Regulation Commission
James Reed Coles (to 12/94) Former State Representative, South Harpswell
Virginia Constantine (to 12/94) Former State Representative, Bar Harbor
Pat Flood (5/94 to 4/95) Regional Forest Manager, International Paper
Neil Crane (4/94 to 4/95) President, Crane Brothers, Inc.
Deborah Garrett (9/94 to 3/95) Former Acting Commissioner, Department of Environmental Protection
Jill Goldthwait (to 12/94) Former Chair, Bar Harbor Town Council
Penny Harris (1/94 to 6/95) Former Director of Development, Eastern Maine Healthcare
Ted Johnston (to 4/94) Former Executive Director, Maine Forest Products Council
Edward Kaelber (to 12/93) Former President, Maine Community Foundation
Stephen Kasprzak (11/93 to 12/93) President, Kasprzak Landbank, Inc.
Dean Marriott (to 3/94) Former Commissioner, Department of Environmental Protection
Debra Richard (3/94 to 9/94) Former Acting Commissioner, Department of Environmental Protection
Floyd Rutherford (to 12/94) Former President, Paper Industry Information Office
Kathryn Weare (to 8/93) Owner, The Cliff House
Carol Wishcamper (to 9/93) Educational Consultant
Samuel Zaitlin (to 11/93) President, I. Zaitlin 
Staff
Cynthia Bertocci Project Administrator, Department of Environmental Protection
Karl Wilkins Department of Environmental Protection
Facilitators
Ann Gosline Attorney, Litchfield
Jonathan Reitman Attorney, Brunswick
U.S. EPA Contact
Marilyn Katz Regional and State Planning Branch, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, Washington, D.C.
Foreword
Back to Table of Contents
The Maine Environmental Priorities Project (MEPP) was established to undertake two ambitious tasks: first, to identify, compare and rank environmental problems facing Maine based on scientific information and public values; and second, to propose management strategies to address these environmental problems.
MEPP was established in May, 1993 by Executive Order 9FY 92-93, issued by Governor John McKernan, and has continued its work with the full support of Governor Angus King.
This report presents the results of the first phase of MEPP's work.
It is the culmination of nearly three years of effort, during which MEPP gathered extensive scientific information, conducted a multifaceted public outreach effort, and ultimately compared and ranked the risks to Maine posed by eleven environmental problem areas.
Following this prioritization phase, MEPP will undertake a second phase in which it will identify strategies to address problem areas.
Supporting documents generated during the Project's first phase, including the reports of technical experts and the results of citizen involvement, may be obtained at this address: Maine Environmental Priorities Project, 17 State House Station, Augusta, ME 04333.
The Project's telephone number is (207) 287 - 6843.
In addition, information can be found on the Internet at the MEPP home page - www.state.me.us/dep/mepphome.htm
Acknowledgments
The MEPP Steering Committee thanks the staff of Northeast Center for Comparative Risk and the Environmental Protection Agency for their invaluable assistance.
The Project deeply appreciates those who served on the Technical Working Groups who gave their valuable time and expertise in preparing the technical reports for the Steering Committee.
The project also thanks the many people who gave of their time to participate in various public involvement activities and provide valuable information.
Finally, the Project is especially grateful to the following organizations for contributing funds which have enabled the Project to complete the Phase I ranking process and begin the work of Phase II:
* Environmental Protection Agency * The Betterment Fund * The Davis Conservation Foundation * The Jessie B. Cox Charitable Trust * The Nature Conservancy, Maine Chapter * Maine Community Foundation, Inc.
* Bath Iron Works Corp.
* Tewhey Associates * Georgia-Pacific Corp.
* Maine Yankee Atomic Power Co.
* International Paper * Cyro Industries * J.M. Huber Corp.
* L.L. Bean, Inc.
* Hannaford Charitable Foundation * Central Maine Power Co.
Introduction
Back to Table of Contents
The Maine Environmental Priorities Project
The Maine Environmental Priorities Project (MEPP) is a new and unprecedented effort in Maine designed to identify, compare and rank environmental problems according to the relative risk they pose to Maine's ecology and to citizens' health and quality of life.
This project came about because a diverse group from government, business, environmental organizations and educational institutions agreed that they shared a common concern that public and private resources be allocated to those environmental problems that pose the greatest risks to the state.
They also agreed that resources are far more likely to be allocated appropriately if there is broad agreement on which problems are the most serious.
This group proposed to Governor McKernan that Maine undertake a comparative risk project to address and respond to these common concerns.
Governor McKernan established the Maine Environmental Priorities Project in 1993.
MEPP is governed by a thirty-seven member Steering Committee that is broadly representative of diverse viewpoints from business, environmental, public, and other sectors.
From the start, the Steering Committee decided to conduct all of its business by consensus, meaning that an action would be taken only if all members concurred.
No one minimized the difficulty of reaching consensus, but all agreed that the work of MEPP would have lasting effect only if all Steering Committee members supported its conclusions.
The Steering Committee has held firm to this commitment and has reached all decisions, including its ranking decisions, by consensus.
Overview of Phase I Work
The goals of Phase I were to collect technical information about Maine's environmental problems and to look at these problems in relation to one another, rather than in isolation, so that environmental policy may be focused on areas of greatest risk.
This report describes the process by which MEPP prepared for the ranking, first by identifying environmental issues facing Maine, and then by gathering scientific information about the extent of risk and soliciting information about the public's experience, concerns, and values.
This report also describes the Steering Committee's process for reaching consensus on the ranking itself.
The body of the report describes each issue area, gives the ranking determined by MEPP, and explains the reasons for the ranking.
Creation of an Issues List
The Steering Committee developed a comprehensive list of environmental issues to be studied.
In developing this list, the Steering Committee considered input from Technical Working Groups of experts (discussed below) and the views of the general public expressed in a survey of over 900 households, in focus group meetings, and in public discussions with specific industry and interest groups.
The Steering Committee initially grouped environmental issues identified through this process into fifteen comprehensive issue areas.
Compilation of Available Scientific Information
Adopting a model which has proved effective in comparative risk projects in other states, MEPP assembled three working groups of volunteers with expertise in technical areas.
Each group was charged with examining a different aspect of the environmental issues: ecological health, human health, or quality of life.
Members of the Technical Working Groups were selected by the Steering Committee for their expertise in areas of importance to the project such as ecology, public health, planning, education, economics and others.
In selecting members, the Steering Committee intentionally sought participation of persons representing a wide spectrum of interests in order to benefit from diverse experiences and perspectives.
The three Technical Working Groups developed papers on the issue areas.
Each group then discussed and reached agreement on the level of concern raised by each issue.
The reports of the Technical Working Groups were compiled into a comprehensive document, which was presented to the Steering Committee and the public in July 1995.
Public Involvement Activities
MEPP undertook an ambitious and unprecedented process to involve the public in all critical phases of the project.
This reflects the Steering Committee's respect for the values and information provided by the public and the Committee's commitment to fuller public education about the nature of environmental risks.
In addition, many Steering Committee members believed that an understanding of the nature of public concerns and values was necessary in a comprehensive review of environmental risks facing the state.
MEPP sought public involvement by publicizing the project generally, through a MEPP newsletter and press releases, and the Project has received coverage by television, radio and print media.
In addition, the Steering Committee undertook numerous activities to elicit public input at a number of points in the project.
First, MEPP focused on gathering public input to inform the development of the issues list.
Public involvement activities included: 8 focus groups; 4 public meetings and 1 community interactive television meeting with multiple sites; and a telephone survey of a random representative sample of over 900 respondents.
A report on these activities was compiled by Critical Insights and issued in April 1994.
In addition, the distribution of the first issue of MEPP's newsletter and publicity concerning the public meetings generated numerous written comments.
In the second phase of public involvement activities, MEPP held a series of meetings to elicit the concerns of particular constituencies among Maine's citizens.
MEPP held separate roundtable discussions for citizens representing each of the following concerns or constituencies:
* outdoor recreation and tourism * environmental groups (two) * health * agriculture * small business and manufacturing * fisheries (two) * forestry
Additionally, in response to invitations, MEPP Steering Committee members attended meetings of other groups to gather input, including meetings of the Agricultural Council of Maine, the Georges River Tidewater Association, the Maine Environmental Education Association, and the Maine Women's Forum.
The third public involvement effort was organized to gather comments in response to the Technical Working Group reports, issued July 1995.
Two public hearing sessions were held and comments were recorded.
Written comments were also received.
Fourth, with assistance from the Maine Council of Churches and Critical Insights, MEPP held a series of community roundtable meetings in September 1995.
Technical Working Group reports were placed in 107 libraries and other locations throughout Maine and over 5000 summaries of these reports were distributed prior to the roundtables.
After eight regional "kick-off" meetings to introduce the project and roundtable process to interested citizens, 36 facilitated roundtables met twice, for two hours each time.
Roundtable participants completed individual questionnaires and held straw polls to elicit participants' rankings during both the first and second sessions.
Information from these roundtables was compiled and presented to the Steering Committee.
Steering Committee Ranking Process
The Steering Committee came to the ranking process with extensive information in the reports of the Technical Working Groups, information gathered in the public involvement process, and with their own expertise.
In preparing for this ranking session, the Steering Committee agreed that it would rank issues based on current circumstances, assuming current control measures in place, and that issues would be compared with one another and ranked as "high risk," "medium risk," or "low risk."
The Steering Committee also agreed that each member could consider any or all of the following factors in whatever balance seemed appropriate to that member:
* Extent of the Problem: How widespread is the problem? * Nature of the Impact or Effect: What is it and how bad is it? * Permanence: How permanent is the impact? Is it recoverable, if so, how long to recover? * Likelihood of Occurrence: How likely is an environmental change to occur? * Trends: Is the situation worsening, stable, improving, or unknown? * Quality of Information: Do we have ample data and how good is the data we have? * Uncertainties: How confident are we in the assessment? How secure are we in the assumptions underlying the assessment, i.e., the continuance of regulations or programs which may be controlling the risk? * Relationship to Other Issue Areas: Is this a fundamental or underlying issue, i.e., one which is the cause of other problems (issues) on the list? Are there synergistic effects? * Public Values: Consideration of comments received from the public.
There was no formula for weighing these factors in the ranking process.
It should be noted that Steering Committee members varied widely in how they incorporated information from the public.
As reflected in ranking narratives, Steering Committee members frequently took note when an issue was associated with marked public concern.
Public Involvement data was frequently referred to in the context of risk to Quality of Life, especially when no report was generated by the Quality of Life Technical Working Group.
Steering Committee members spent three days discussing and developing comparative rankings for the issues.
In total, the group worked through more than a dozen rounds of tentative rankings.
Through extensive discussion, the Committee ultimately reached consensus on the rankings.
They then developed a statement about each issue with which they all could agree.
Those statements appear in the body of this Report.
In the Steering Committee's discussion, the issue groupings were adjusted, so that the final listing of issues to be ranked emerged as:
* Drinking Water and Domestic Use Water * Freshwater and Marine Ecosystems * Indoor Air * Outdoor Air * Surface Water and Sediments * Terrestrial Ecosystems * Global Climate Change * Land and Agricultural Resources * Solid, Special, and Hazardous Waste * Stratospheric Ozone Depletion * Ground Water (not used for drinking water or domestic use) * Radiation
Critical Assumptions and Limitations in the Ranking Process
The Steering Committee ranked a number of environmental issues as high or medium.
The reader should be aware that not all issues that one might associate with an issue group raised a uniform level of concern.
In the narrative explaining the rankings, the Steering Committee identified specific problems within the issue area that led to the ranking.
In ranking the issues, the Steering Committee assumed the existence of current statutory and regulatory control programs and measures.
The reader should be aware that risks from a particular environmental issue may be ranked medium or low in part because of the success of the current control programs, for example, the current level of commitment to cleaning up waste sites.
The Steering Committee wishes to note that its efforts to undertake a careful evaluation of certain potential environmental risks were significantly hampered by the unavailability of basic scientific data.
These problems are noted throughout the body of this report.
See, for example, in the statement concerning Land and Agricultural Resources, discussion of the lack of statewide monitoring of soils to determine what chemicals, if any, are being deposited; in the statement concerning Outdoor Air, discussion of the lack of data on potential health impacts of air toxics; in the statement concerning Surface Water and Sediments, discussion of inadequate monitoring of potential toxic contamination in estuarine and marine waters.
The lack of availability of data on Toxins in the Workplace presented such a serious problem that the Steering Committee was unable to assign any ranking to this issue area.
Next Steps - Phase II
In the next phase of its work MEPP will develop recommendations for risk management strategies based on the prioritization of Phase I. Working with state agencies, the Steering Committee will develop recommendations to: * Choose the appropriate risk management approach for each of the major risks * Reform institutions of environmental policy in Maine to better reflect priorities * Continue and expand public involvement in the formulation of environmental policy * Develop ways to measure risk reductions and the effectiveness of risk management strategies
It is the Steering Committee's hope that this work will ultimately lead to environmental policy based on continuous reassessment of risks as new information becomes available and new strategies are implemented to address problems.
These Phase II efforts will be closely linked with, and where appropriate, woven together with, other ongoing initiatives.
Integrated Ranking of Issue Areas
Back to Table of Contents
The following discussions of the issue areas are grouped according to rank.
Issue areas within a grouping are listed alphabetically.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank1.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue examines health risks from contaminated water supplies, including concerns about the contamination of sources (ground water and surface water), the effects of treatment processes such as chlorination, and the leaching of pollutants (such as lead) into water from piping and plumbing fixtures.
Exposures to people through drinking, absorption of contaminants through the skin, and the breathing of vapors emitted from contaminated water are considered.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that, compared to the other issues ranked, the contamination of drinking water in Maine constitutes a high risk to both human health and quality of life.
The primary reasons for the high ranking are: the high percentage of Maine people who derive their drinking water from private wells; the numerous and geographically dispersed instances of ground water contamination that have been documented; the ongoing threats of additional contamination; and the fact that individual, privately owned wells are not required to be tested.
The fact that some public water supplies occasionally exceed health standards for certain contaminants also contributed to the high ranking.
Discussion:
About 540,000 Maine people obtain drinking water from self-supplied sources, predominantly individual ground water wells.
The remainder of the population (689,000) obtain drinking water from public water supplies.
Of those supplied by public systems, 20-25% are supplied by ground water; and the remainder are supplied by surface water.
There are no testing or monitoring requirements for self supplied systems except for a safety test during transfer of ownership.
The 2,400 public water supplies in Maine are monitored through the nationally mandated drinking water program administered at the state level by the Maine Department of Human Services.
Human Health: Concern over water quality often focuses on the risks associated with ingestion or drinking of contaminated water.
Other important means of human exposure include absorption of contaminants through the skin during water use such as washing or bathing and the inhalation or breathing of contaminants such as radon that have been volatilized from the water into the air as occurs during showering.
Private Supplies: The Steering Committee concluded that risk is greatest for users of private water supplies.
The majority of private drinking water supplies use ground water as their source of water.
They are at highest risk since there are no testing or location requirements except a required distance from wastewater disposal (septic) systems.
Inadequate and malfunctioning septic systems contaminate wells in Maine despite the current setback requirements.
Furthermore, there are very few controls in place to protect existing wells from new sources of contamination.
Private drinking water supplies in Maine have been contaminated by the following chemicals: * Nitrates and nitrites from septic systems and fertilizer storage areas.
Of 5,340 Maine wells tested, approximately 2% (more than 100 wells) were found to exceed the 10 mg Nitrogen/l standard because of their proximity to septic systems.
Of the wells surveyed in cropland areas in Maine 21% also exceeded the nitrate standard.
* Petroleum products from gasoline and fuel oil spills and storage tank leaks including benzene, toluene, ethyl-benzene, xylene, and MTBE.
Since 1988, more than 400 wells have been identified as contaminated due to petroleum spills.
* Chemicals used primarily in manufacturing and industry that were improperly disposed of in the past and continue to be subject to accidental spills during use, transport, and handling.
Dense non aqueous phase liquids (DNAPLS) including trichloroethylene, tetrachloroethylene and 1,1,1 trichloroethane are common contaminants.
These chemicals are toxic and particularly difficult to recover from ground water making restoration of a contaminated supply nearly impossible.
Approximately 200 Maine wells have been abandoned due to contamination or the threat of contamination from hazardous waste sites.
* Arsenic: Of 4,700 supplies tested by the Maine Geological Survey, 11.5% (more than 400) were found to exceed EPA's maximum contamination level of 50 parts per billion which was set for public water supplies.
* Pesticides: Limited studies in Maine indicate concern for wells near agricultural spray areas.
Public Supplies : Public water supplies are regulated by the Department of Human Services' Drinking Water Program and hence are of lesser concern.
It should be noted, though, that the level of monitoring varies with the size and type of the system.
Tests on some smaller systems have shown elevated levels of certain contaminants of concern.
Approximately 20-25% of the 689,000 Maine people served by public water supplies receive their water from ground water sources.
The supplies derived from ground water are subject to risks similar to those associated with private supplies.
However, the majority of public water supplies derive their water from surface water bodies and are therefore at greater risk for microbial contamination by bacteria and by parasites such as giardia and cryptosporidium.
Problems with microbial contamination are evident in the increasing number of "boil" orders issued by the Department of Human Services.
In 1994, 37 orders were issued; 1995, 46 orders were issued.
Because of the widespread presence of microbes in surface water supplies, public supplies are always chlorinated and, for the most part, filtered to prevent outbreaks of infectious diseases.
However, certain methods of chlorination produce by-products known as trihalomethanes which are themselves health hazards.
Best available practices can reduce, but not eliminate, these by-products.
EPA has set a total trihalomethane standard of 100 parts per billion (ppb).
This standard represents a 1.74 in 10,000 excess cancer risk.
In the period between 1989 and October 1995, 10,700 water samples from public supplies were tested for total trihalomethanes.
Of these, total trihalomethanes were detected in 4008 samples.
Finally, lead from lead-soldered pipe used in plumbing prior to 1987 and from brass plumbing fixtures with a high lead content remains a health concern.
Any source of exposure to lead is considered a significant human health risk, especially for developing fetuses and young children.
Quality of Life: The Steering Committee concluded that contamination of drinking water in Maine constitutes a high risk, based on the threat to both human health and Maine people's quality of life.
Information collected through public involvement activities revealed that clean, pure drinking water is viewed as a fundamental right.
Threats to drinking water affect people's peace of mind, the traditional character of Maine, and future generations.
Fairness is also an issue since many low-income people cannot afford to test their water supply.
In addition, contamination of water supplies can have significant economic impacts.
Six case studies of contaminated municipal water supplies in Maine found that the cost of replacing a municipal well, including emergency water supplies, water treatment and remediation can range from $500,000 to $1,500,000 per well.
The Steering Committee acknowledges that public concerns for ground water are linked closely to concerns for maintaining sources of safe drinking water.
Protection of ground water is critical to the maintenance of healthful drinking water supplies.
Once contaminated, ground water is difficult to clean up.
The cumulative loss of clean ground water represents the loss of a critical resource for current and future generations.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank2.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue focuses on the physical alteration of aquatic ecosystems including fresh and coastal waters, wetlands, and the fish, wildlife, and other natural resources that occur in these areas.
These alterations result in the loss of wetlands to development, habitat degradation, loss of native species, introduction of exotic species, hydrologic manipulation, and unsustainable fishing practices.
This issue is closely linked with the issue of contamination of Surface Water and Sediments.
Summary Statement:
There was consensus among Steering Committee members that the overall risk to aquatic ecological systems from certain factors which physically alter or otherwise impact the normal structure and function of aquatic ecosystems is a high risk compared to the other issues ranked.
The Steering Committee believes that a number of factors are having a significant impact on the viability of freshwater and marine ecosystems and also impacting the quality of life in Maine.
The high rating by the Steering Committee was based on the following factors: * the "spreading out" patterns of development and associated activities such as road construction are impacting wetlands in southern and coastal Maine and causing non-point sources of pollution thereby affecting the quality of surface water statewide; * increasing use of Maine's inland waters for development and recreational purposes and associated disturbances are affecting the traditional character and ecology of Maine lakes; * fragmentation and loss of riparian habitat by development are affecting many species of wildlife that use the habitats provided by the land-water interface and are impacting the productivity of adjacent waters and wetlands; * some marine fish stocks are declining and there is a need to ensure that the commercial harvest of marine species stays within sustainable ranges; * certain unsustainable fishing practices are impacting marine habitats; * chemical and biological contaminants are accumulating in aquatic organisms raising ecological and food safety concerns (see discussion under Surface Water and Sediments); and * the economic dislocation associated with the collapse of certain marine fisheries has a disproportionate impact on coastal communities and threatens Maine's seafood industry.
In addition, the introduction of non-native species, dredging and sedimentation in coastal bays and estuaries contributed to this high ranking.
The Committee recognizes that the use of dams to harness water power on many river systems has had a major impact on many of Maine's waters and the fisheries they are capable of maintaining; however, there was no consensus regarding the ongoing nature of these risks.
Discussion:
Ecology: Freshwater and marine ecosystems including wetlands, lakes, rivers and streams, and estuarine and marine waters form an integrated system which is closely tied to the health of the surrounding terrestrial ecosystems.
Human development and use of Maine's land and water resources can have a direct and long lasting impact on the ability of these ecosystems to function and sustain fish and wildlife and other natural resources.
Land Use: The Steering Committee concluded that wetlands loss and alteration due to development and transportation systems is a critical problem in southern and coastal Maine.
Coastal wetlands are most at risk due to their scarcity and great development pressure.
More than 80% of the licensed alterations over the past four years (1990 - 1993) have occurred in Class 1 wetlands; 99% in coastal wetlands.
Class 1 wetlands include coastal wetlands, great ponds, wetlands with endangered or threatened plant species, and wetlands with certain critical habitats.
Wetlands serve a variety of functions: critical habitat, flood protection, ground water recharge, shoreline erosion control, pollution attenuation, sediment trapping, food and wood production, recreation, education, and research.
The greatest functional loss from alterations has been the loss of aquatic habitat and a reduction in pollution attenuation and sediment trapping.
Small wetlands, many of which have not been regulated by Maine's wetlands protection laws, also play an important role in maintaining many species of wildlife and are extremely vulnerable to development.
Lakes are highly vulnerable to land use activities within their watersheds.
Of 2,314 Maine lakes that have been evaluated by the Department of Environmental Protection, 238 are considered somewhat impaired and 304 are likely to decline in water quality over the next 20 to 50 years due to changes in surrounding land use.
Although there have been substantial improvements in areas such as agriculture and forestry due to the implementation of best management practices and a decrease in farmland, residential development has emerged as a high risk to lakes statewide, but especially in central and southern Maine.
With development comes a number of associated problems including: the loss of riparian habitat that is important to many wildlife species, pressure from recreational activities, and the loss of natural buffer zones that retain nutrients and contaminants.
Increased human activity associated with development keeps sensitive wildlife species, such as nesting loons and other water birds, from using available habitats.
Runoff from residential development is a major source of nutrient loading to Maine lakes.
These nutrients accelerate lake eutrophication and are responsible for algal blooms and the replacement of cold water fisheries with cool or warm water fisheries.
Eutrophication is difficult if not impossible to reverse in most instances.
With respect to rivers, development and agricultural and forestry operations that do not employ best management practices pose a high risk to riverine habitat through loss of riparian vegetation, erosion, sedimentation, and flow modification.
Concern is highest for disruption of the riparian zone along headwater streams.
These areas are high in the watershed and therefore affect all downstream systems.
They provide important spawning and nursery areas and naturally cool habitat for many species of fish.
Poor land use and construction practices can cause of excessive sedimentation in streams and brooks that flow into estuaries and marine waters.
Sediment entering these waters accumulates in near shore environments burying habitat and smothering bottom dwelling plants and animals.
Suspended particulate matter clogs filter feeders and blocks sunlight for phytoplankton, macro algae, and submerged aquatic vegetation changing the structure of bottom communities and decreasing productivity.
The subsequent dredging of harbors to improve access for human activity has been shown in some instances in Maine to undermine adjacent salt marshes, flats, and tidal wetlands.
In addition the re-deposition of dredged sediments increases water turbidity and redistributes chemical contaminants that were previously locked up in sediments.
Risks to aquatic ecosystems from development are long-term since impacts associated with development are cumulative and, for the most part, irreversible.
Introduction of Non-Native Species: Maine's freshwater fisheries have long been intensively managed for sport fishing by the state.
Non-native species such as the small and largemouth bass and brown trout were introduced by the state into many waters, while native game species such as the brook trout, lake trout, and landlocked salmon were established in many waters where they did not previously exist.
These changes have had a major impact on the current nature of Maine lakes and rivers, the fisheries they support, and the values they provide Maine people.
The Steering Committee noted that, in addition to planned introductions, accidental and illegal introductions occur posing some risk to current fisheries.
Competition with and predation by introduced exotic non-native fish species have altered fish community structure in a number of Maine lakes including Sebago and Umbagog.
Recent unauthorized introductions of northern pike, muskellunge, black crappie, and several minnow species have altered fish communities in a number of lakes.
Dams and Hydrologic Manipulation: The development of dams over the last 200 years for water power generation radically changed many of Maine's lakes and major rivers, the flow characteristics of entire watersheds, and impacted marine habitats.
These dams inundated wetlands and riverine habitats, enlarged existing lakes and ponds, and created water impoundments that previously did not exist.
These changes contributed to the demise of historic runs of several species of anadromous fish such as Atlantic salmon, sturgeon, alewives, and smelt.
At the same time they created habitat suitable for other fish species.
Although the Steering Committee recognizes that the construction of dams and the manipulation of water flows has had a significant impact on riverine ecosystems through the alteration of shore lands and fisheries, there was no consensus on the question of whether the benefits of future dam construction outweigh the environmental impact.
There was no discussion on the advisability of removing existing dams.
Harvesting in Estuaries and Marine Waters: A number of commercially important species in the Gulf of Maine are considered over fished.
Maine ground fish landings declined by 40% between 1982 and 1993.
Clam stocks have declined 67% statewide since 1982; 84% in Washington and Hancock Counties.
Although lobster landings are at record levels, recent stock assessments indicate the resource is over fished and that a 20% decline in mortality from fishing is needed to prevent a population decline.
There is also growing concern over harvesting rates of the green sea urchin.
Over fishing has been identified as the primary cause behind the collapse of the ground fish resources, although it is unclear what impact coastal pollution is having on the decline in coastal fisheries productivity.
Harvesting practices such as bottom dragging are of concern to some, including the lobster industry, because of the potential impact on benthic lobster habitat with resultant nursery ground loss and recruitment decline.
Although the declines in certain commercial fisheries are disturbing, there is very little data on the relationship between these population declines and impacts at the ecosystem level.
Human Health: The introduction of species, even those which occur naturally, can have unforeseen and significant human health consequences.
The dinoflagellate responsible for paralytic shellfish poisoning apparently became permanently established in the Gulf of Maine following a storm in 1972 when the organism and its cysts (the resting stage of the organism) were introduced to these waters.
Outbreaks, known as red tides, are now a common seasonal occurrence in the Gulf.
These tiny marine organism produce a toxin that can accumulate in shellfish such as clams, mussels, oysters and scallops thereby causing paralytic shellfish poisoning.
The potential for human illness from paralytic shellfish poisoning is controlled by an extensive monitoring and management program.
When the toxin reaches dangerous levels in shellfish tissue, the Department of Marine Resources closes the affected area to shellfish harvesting.
While Committee concern over paralytic shellfish poisoning is comparatively low because of the monitoring program, this food safety concern did add further weight to the overall ranking of Freshwater and Marine Ecosystems.
Other potential food safety concerns are addressed in the issue of Surface Water and Sediments.
Quality of Life: The Steering Committee concluded that negative impacts from alteration and destruction of freshwater and marine ecosystems on recreation, the state's seafood industry, the character of coastal towns, and economics are all high.
Maine's freshwater and marine ecosystems are highly valued for their recreational and commercial potential.
A survey done by the Maine Office of Tourism found that 46% of tourists go fishing, boating, or enjoy some other water activities while in Maine.
Inland recreational fisheries were valued at $300 to $495 million in 1988.
Marine recreational fisheries were valued at $135 to $275 million in 1990.
Commercial fishing employed approximately 17,000 at least part-time in 1994.
Commercial fish landings in 1993 were valued at $225 million with the total contribution to the Maine economy estimated at $1.1 billion in 1992.
While the overall economic value of commercial fisheries may be low relative to other industries statewide, it is concentrated in small harbors and villages all up and down the coast.
Maine's offshore islands are able to support year-round communities primarily because of the fishing industry.
The fishing industry supports families, communities, and a way of life that underlies the social fabric of many of Maine's coastal communities.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank3.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue addresses risks posed by the presence of radon and airborne chemical and biological contaminants in residences, office buildings, schools, and public buildings.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that, compared to other issues, the chemical contamination of indoor air poses a high risk.
Indoor Air is ranked high due to the fact that a large number of Maine people are exposed to unsafe levels of radon, environmental tobacco smoke, combustion by-products, lead, and other hazardous air pollutants in our homes, office buildings, and schools.
In many instances, the general population is unaware of the extent of exposure and the degree of risk.
For many, the exposure is involuntary.
Discussion:
Up to 90% of an individual's time is spent indoors in a home or an office environment where the air is often contaminated by radon gas and an array of biological and chemical contaminants.
Given the amount of time spent indoors, exposure to levels of contaminants that are unhealthful may occur for extended periods of time.
Potential health impacts from indoor air pollution are numerous and well documented.
They include cancer as well as developmental, reproductive, neurological, behavioral, and respiratory effects.
Human Health: In Maine, a number of common indoor air contaminants pose a high risk to large numbers of people.
Maine residents are at higher risk from radon than residents in most other areas of the United States because of Maine's granite geology.
To date, about 12,000 Maine homes have been tested for radon, 30% of these have exceeded the recommended maximum level of 4 picoCuries/liter (pC/l) in air.
[Note: the standard of 4 pC/l is an achievable standard which actually represents an increased cancer risk of 2 in 1000.]
Based on 1990 census data of 3.1 persons per household, existing test data indicate that 9,300 individuals at a minimum are exposed to radon at levels which represent a 2 in 1000 excess lifetime cancer risk.
In addition, a survey of Maine schools during the 1988 - 1990 school years found 98.6% of the school buildings with measurable concentrations of radon; 32.2% (204) with one or more classrooms exceeding the standard of 4 pC/l.
The major health effect associated with radon is an increased risk of lung cancer.
Environmental tobacco smoke (ETS) has been classified a Class A carcinogen by EPA and is responsible for an increase in lung cancer deaths (approximately 3000 annually in non-smokers in the U.S. according to U.S. EPA) and a host of other health effects.
Although recent laws have limited smoking in many environments, significant exposures continue.
Children whose parents smoke at home are a population of special concern.
In 1992 (the most recent year for which data are available), 23% of Maine adults were smokers.
A recent study of children in Portland, Maine demonstrated an increased risk of asthma exacerbation and worsened pulmonary function in asthmatic children exposed to ETS.
National studies have shown a correlation between ETS and bronchitis and pneumonia in children under 18 months of age.
ETS has also been implicated as a cause of sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) with one study finding that victims were almost four times more likely to have been exposed to second-hand smoke.
In addition, the continuation of smoking in restaurants remains a health hazard for both customers and, particularly, for employees.
Furthermore, non-smoking areas in public establishments where smoking is permitted are often inaccessible to disabled Mainers for whom exposure constitutes a direct and immediate hazard.
The Steering Committee also concluded that combustion by-products and lead based paint pose high health risks.
Occupants of temporary classrooms, mobile homes and "tight" homes are at increased risk from the contamination of indoor air from combustion by-products from wood stoves, improperly vented heating systems or cook stoves, and other combustion sources.
It is estimated that 27% of the homes in Maine have inadequate ventilation, potentially affecting 330,000 individuals.
In addition 85% of the temporary classrooms in Maine have exposed school aged children to carbon dioxide levels that exceed health standards.
Finally 80-85% of Maine's housing was constructed prior to 1960.
Lead-based paint was not banned from residential use until 1978.
Since some paints were as much as 50% lead, much of the childhood population of Maine is at risk for serious developmental and learning disabilities.
While ingestion of lead paint chips is the most common cause of acute lead poisoning in children, inhalation of lead dust is also a concern.
Since lead is absorbed into the bloodstream after inhalation, there is also a special risk to developing fetuses.
Other indoor air contaminants that contributed to the overall ranking include: * chemicals in building materials: While there are often non-toxic alternative, many building materials continue to contain chemicals such as formaldehyde which are emitted into the air after installation; * petroleum vapors from leaking tanks: Many Maine homes contain heating oil tanks that may leak petroleum fumes into indoor air; * biological allergens: Biological allergens affect up to 250,000 Maine people.
Although the health effects associated with biological allergens such as molds and pollen are not carcinogenic, they can be debilitating; and * contaminants from the improper use of household products such as pesticides, paints, and solvents.
While there is the potential for widespread exposure from improper use, exposure is avoidable.
Actual exposure from such products cannot be predicted.
Quality of Life: Indoor air pollution can have a negative impact on one's health and, consequently, one's enjoyment of life.
Given the susceptibility of children to many of these contaminants, indoor air pollution also poses important problems for the health of future generations.
Since Maine people spend a large percentage of their time indoors, exposure to indoor air contaminants is difficult to avoid.
Although there are remedies that may be implemented, exposure for many, most notably children, is not voluntary.
Sub-populations of special concern include children, the elderly, persons sensitized to the contaminants of concern, people with various diseases such as asthma, and low income people trapped in substandard housing that is poorly maintained.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank4.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue addresses chemical contamination of the air and the effects of such contamination upon human health, ecological systems, and quality of life.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that contamination of Outdoor Air poses a high risk compared to other environmental risks facing Maine.
Outdoor Air is ranked high primarily due to concerns about the health effects associated with ground-level ozone and the atmospheric transport and deposition of mercury.
Other factors which contributed to the high risk ranking were: * the critical importance of clean air; * the complex nature of air pollution formation and impacts; * concern over the interstate transport and deposition of atmospheric pollutants; * the fact that as knowledge of potential health effects associated with air contaminants increases, the trend has been for acceptable levels of exposure to decrease; * the link between air pollution and Global Climate Change and Stratospheric Ozone Depletion; and * the negative impacts of ground level ozone and mercury deposition on Mainers' quality of life.
Some Steering Committee members also noted the relatively high percentage of toxic emissions to air compared with other environmental media.
Although the Steering Committee came to no conclusions about the degree of risk to ecological systems from outdoor air pollution, concerns about impacts from certain pollutants contributed to the high ranking.
There was also no consensus with respect to risks from dioxin or particulates.
Discussion:
Outdoor air is a critical environmental medium for which there is no substitute.
It is a primary route of human exposure to contaminants and a gateway to contamination of other media including land, water, and indoor air.
The interaction of contaminants in the outdoor air is complex and has local, regional, and global effects.
Ecology: The Steering Committee reached no conclusions on the degree of risk to Maine's natural communities from outdoor air pollution other than that associated with the documented connection to Global Climate Change and Stratospheric Ozone Depletion.
However, concerns about impacts from certain pollutants contributed to the high ranking.
The Committee noted that data on the ecological impacts of air pollution are limited.
Deposition of most pollutants occurs after long-range transport, making identification of source-receptor and cause and effect relationships in terrestrial ecosystems very difficult.
In its deliberations the Steering Committee noted the concern in the scientific community over ground-level ozone and the long range transport and deposition of nitrogen oxides, mercury, and polychlorinated chemicals.
Concentrations of ozone in Maine's air do exceed threshold levels for plant damage on an episodic basis.
Nitrogen oxides are of concern due to the potential for soil acidification and resulting imbalances in nutrient cycling and their role (along with sulfur oxides) in the acidification of some lakes.
Nitrogen oxides also contribute to the formation of ground-level ozone.
Mercury and some polychlorinated chemicals have been shown to negatively affect the reproduction of high level predators such as eagles.
Human Health: The health effects associated with pollutants for which criteria have been established by federal law (ozone, particulates, sulfur dioxide, nitrogen dioxide, carbon monoxide, and lead) are well documented and historic data show a direct correlation between air quality and human health.
The Steering Committee concluded that considerable progress has been made in controlling emissions of most criteria pollutants.
However, apart from ozone, consensus was not reached regarding the remaining degree of risk posed by several other criteria pollutants, especially particulates.
However, there was Steering Committee consensus that the formation and transport of ground-level ozone remains a high risk compared to other environmental problems.
The Steering Committee noted that while some ground-level ozone is generated in Maine, both ozone and precursors of ozone (NOx and VOCs) are also transported into Maine from other areas in the U.S.
The increase in pollution from mobile sources is related, in part, to a sprawling pattern of urban and suburban development.
Combined with other factors, this contributed to a 60% increase in the vehicle miles traveled in Maine from 1980-1990, compared with a 9% increase in population and a 17% increase in households.
The state legislature has determined that for regulatory purposes, the federal ozone standard (0.12 ppm) shall be used.
However, the legislature also has directed the Department of Environmental Protection to issue health warnings to Maine people when the level of ozone to which Maine people are exposed, or expected to be exposed, exceeds 0.081 ppm for more than one hour during any day.
During the past decade, this state health warning level has been exceeded each summer throughout much of the state, particularly the most populated areas.
In 1995, this state health warning level was exceeded on 28 days for a total of 614 hours (as of September 8th).
Potential health effects from exposure to ozone are both acute and chronic and include decreases in respiratory function, decreased lung capacity in children, increased susceptibility to infection, and permanent lung damage.
While the entire population of Maine is at risk for adverse health effects, children, the elderly and those with respiratory illnesses (approximately 450,000 Maine people) are most susceptible.
As noted above, the Steering Committee concluded that atmospheric transport and deposition of mercury is of high concern.
Elevated levels of methyl mercury have been found in lake fish statewide including fish from remote lakes.
There is currently a health advisory on fish caught in Maine lakes indicating that pregnant women, nursing mothers and children less than eight years old should avoid eating fish taken from Maine lakes.
Others should limit their consumption of fish from lakes to between 6 and 22 fish meals per month.
Although there was no consensus, the atmospheric transport and deposition of persistent organic compounds such as DDT and dioxins is of concern to some Steering Committee members.
These chemicals are soluble in fat and concentrate in the food chain.
They reach humans primarily through animal fat in meat, milk, dairy products, and fish.
While these chemicals have long been known to cause harm in wildlife (such as eggshell thinning in birds), knowledge of their potential to interfere with the hormone system including the human hormone or endocrine system is very recent.
The possible link between these endocrine disrupting chemicals and human health effects such as breast and ovarian cancer in women and lowered sperm count and testicular cancer in men is the subject of recent scientific research but is not well understood at this time.
The Steering Committee did not reach consensus on the degree of risk to human health from a wide range of chemicals collectively known as hazardous air pollutants or air toxics.
The Steering Committee concluded that additional information is needed to determine the health impacts of current emissions and cumulative discharges of these chemicals.
Some committee members noted that the discharge or loading of toxins to the air from stationary sources such as industrial facilities and waste incinerators is greater than the loading to other environmental media.
TRI (Toxics Release Inventory) releases for Maine facilities in 1993 were 10,619,968 pounds to air; 625,901 pounds to surface water; and 1,378,229 pounds to land.
Mobile sources, including the automobile, also contribute to the presence of hazardous air pollutants as well as the formation of ground-level ozone.
In addition to relatively high emissions, monitoring of ambient levels of hazardous air pollutants has been extremely limited and there are very few health based standards against which to assess risk.
The Steering Committee discussed the concern in the scientific community over the risk from long distance atmospheric transport and deposition of persistent chemicals.
Some of these chemicals are highly toxic and bioaccumulate in the food chain posing risks to human consumers.
The Steering Committee concluded that comprehensive monitoring is needed to determine the full extent of the risks associated with atmospheric deposition of these pollutants.
Quality of Life: The Steering Committee concluded that contamination of outdoor air poses important risks to Maine's quality of life.
Chief among these risks are the impact of ground-level ozone on both vulnerable and healthy members of the population.
Recreation and other outdoor activities are curtailed or altered for all during high ozone events.
Decreased visibility associated with outdoor air pollution, particularly in the spring and summer months, negatively affects recreational experiences and the enjoyment of Maine's natural beauty.
Poor air quality, warnings of unhealthful ozone levels, health advisories on fish from Maine lakes as a result of mercury deposition all negatively affect the image of Maine as a relatively pristine state and thus have the potential to negatively affect tourism and the Maine economy.
Outdoor air is also of critical importance to the general public, as shown in their expressions of concern to the MEPP.
This public concern added further weight to the overall ranking of high for this issue area.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank5.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue discusses the impacts associated with contamination of lakes, rivers, estuaries, and coastal waters.
Risks from both point and non-point source discharges and the accumulation of contaminants in sediment are considered.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that contamination of surface waters from certain sources poses a high risk compared to the other issues ranked.
This high risk ranking was based primarily upon the Steering Committee's concern over the impact to fish life, other wildlife and to plant life from the chemical contamination of these waters and the decrease in Mainers' quality of life from these resources being significantly degraded and limited in their uses.
This ranking for contamination of Surface Water and Sediments is also closely associated with the high ranking assigned to Freshwater and Marine Ecosystems
There was consensus on the high risk to ecological systems from non-point sources of contamination including septic systems, storm water runoff, and combined sewer overflows and from the atmospheric transport and deposition of mercury.
These sources contribute contaminants such as nutrients, mercury and other heavy metals, toxic organics, pesticides, and pathogens to surface water bodies and sediments.
The Steering Committee also concluded that patterns of development have a major impact on the generation of non-point source pollution.
Additional factors that contributed to the high ranking include: * the value of the water resources of the state, * the fact that water bodies are interconnected through water flows, * the critical nature of estuarine habitats for marine life, and * the potential for accumulation and redistribution of toxic contaminants in biota and sediments.
There was no consensus on the relative risk from specific chemicals associated with various point sources of contamination such as municipal and industrial waste water discharges or the chlorination of waste water discharges.
There was also no consensus on the relative threat from petroleum transport and transfer in coastal waters.
With respect to human health, the Steering Committee is aware of known dangers to human health from consumption of some lake and river fish and lobster tomalley (liver) that have accumulated unhealthful levels of chemical contaminants.
The Committee concluded that there is very little data on the discharge to, or contamination of, surface waters by various agents except for existing data on mercury in lakes and dioxin in rivers and estuaries.
Discussion:
Maine has eight major watersheds which drain to the Gulf of Maine through surface and ground water flows.
Within these watersheds are 31,672 miles of mapped rivers and streams; 5,785 lakes larger than 1 acre; and 1,633 square miles of estuaries.
These water bodies are linked with one another through water flows.
Although the relative threats to these water bodies from various sources and contaminants may vary in degree from one to another, contamination upstream will be felt downstream.
Ecology: The major chemical contaminants from an ecological perspective are: biological oxygen demand (BOD), nutrients, acids, heavy metals, petroleum, pesticides, toxic organic compounds, and chlorine.
The relative significance of each varies with the type of water body.
Impacts vary from immediate and acute poisoning of wildlife to long term changes in dominant species and ecosystem function.
Lakes: The Steering Committee concluded that non-point source pollution such as runoff from commercial and residential development, septic systems, storm sewers, agricultural activity and atmospheric deposition are important non-point sources of pollution.
Non point source pollution originates in large part from activities on the land.
Its magnitude is greatly affected by patterns of development: in general, the more spread out urban and suburban development is (requiring more roadways and ditching, larger parking lots, larger lawns, etc.), the greater the land area that is altered and the greater the potential for non point source pollution.
Contaminants of concern include: * BOD: Organic enrichment affects 192,000 lake acres and is the major cause of degraded fisheries in 133,000 acres mostly in the St. John, Kennebec, and southern coastal basins.
The most significant ecological impact is the shift in the composition of bottom dwelling communities and fish towards organisms tolerant of low dissolved oxygen concentrations.
* Nutrients: A total of 387,000 lake acres (39%) in Maine are threatened or fail to meet standards because of nutrient problems.
Nutrient enrichment in lakes caused by changes in land use within watersheds (including residential and commercial development) appears to be worsening.
Nutrient impacts are linked with effects similar to those associated with increased BOD.
* Metals including Mercury: In 1994, 10% of the fish taken from lakes statewide, including remote lakes, had mercury levels higher than the federal human health standard of 1 part per million; 50% higher than the state level of 0.5 parts per million.
Levels of mercury in some inland eagle populations are near levels associated with reproductive failure.
Elevated levels of mercury and lead have been associated with emaciated loon carcasses in Maine.
There was no consensus on the risk from acid rain and the resultant potential for lake acidification.
Rivers and Streams: The Steering Committee concluded that industrial point sources, domestic waste treatment, and combined sewer overflows affect the most river miles; however, there was no consensus on the threats from specific contaminants.
Steering Committee members noted the following: * Monitoring of Maine's rivers and streams has documented the presence of contaminants such as biological oxygen demanding (BOD) substances, nutrients, petroleum compounds, pesticides, heavy metals, acids, toxic organic compounds (solvents, polynuclear aromatic hydrocarbons, dioxins, furans, PCBs) and chlorine.
* Acid deposition and acidification of headwater streams during snow melt and high rainfall events can be harmful to some aquatic organisms, including fish, which are especially sensitive to pH during early stages of development.
Estuarine and Marine Waters : The primary risk factors for estuarine and marine waters influencing the Steering Committee's high ranking of this issue were nutrients, metals and other toxic compounds, and pathogens from both point and non-point sources.
The entire coast of Maine is vulnerable to nutrient enrichment.
Excessive nutrient loading can result in a combination of adverse impacts including nuisance and toxic algae blooms, noxious odors, oxygen depletion, and massive mortality of marine life.
Death of large amounts of shellfish in Maquoit Bay and Saco Bay are thought to have been associated with nutrients, although no definite cause has been established.
Trends are worsening.
Metals are of concern because when river waters meet salt water, metals tend to settle out and become concentrated in estuarine sediments.
Elevated levels of metals have be recorded in estuarine sediments in 25 estuaries from the Piscataqua River to Bass Harbor on Mt. Desert Island.
Regarding other toxic compounds, the Steering Committee noted that limited monitoring data has shown the presence of certain toxic compounds at levels of concern at several locations along the Maine coast.
However, what monitoring information is available is inadequate to determine the extent of contamination or the nature of any potential problems.
Municipal discharges, combined sever overflows, and overboard discharges contribute an array of chemical and biological contaminants to coastal waters.
Forty-five to fifty Maine communities discharge raw sewage diluted with storm water through combined sewer overflows during rain storms: an estimated 720 million gallons annually from Portland; 635 million gallons annually from Bangor.
There are approximately 2500 individual overboard (direct) discharges, 90% of which discharge to coastal waters.
Approximately 22% of Maine's shellfish areas (195,000 of 900,000 acres in 1990) are closed either seasonally or full-time due to bacterial contamination.
With respect to petroleum, the Committee noted the large volumes in transport and the high public concern along the entire coast over the potential for a catastrophic oil spill.
The Committee also noted the state's ongoing spill prevention and emergency preparedness efforts.
Human Health: The Steering Committee discussed but did not reach consensus on the degree of risk to human health from contamination of surface waters and sediments by toxic organic compounds and metals that are persistent and can bioaccumulate in fish and shellfish.
Some members noted that toxic organic chemicals are discharged to Maine waters from a variety of point and non-point sources.
Dioxin concentrations in some fish from some Maine rivers and in the tomalley of lobsters taken from these river estuaries have resulted in the issuance of health advisories by the Maine Bureau of Health for 236 river miles.
A 1994 statewide survey, which found widespread presence of mercury in Maine freshwater fish resulted in a statewide fish consumption advisory for Maine lakes.
Quality of Life: Public involvement activities indicate that Maine people place a very high value on water quality.
It is critical to the health of our commercial and recreational fisheries, the tourism industry, and our sense of Maine.
Commercial fish landings were valued at $225 million in 1993, while the total economic contribution of Maine's commercial fisheries was $1.1 billion in 1992.
The total economic value of Maine's shellfish industry is estimated at $52 million annually.
At the same time a significant percentage of the shellfish areas are closed to harvesting due to microbial contamination.
There are no good estimates of the economic loss associated with the closure of shellfish areas; however, the cost for closures in Casco Bay alone was estimated at between $1.6 and 1.7 million for 1994.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank6.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue addresses risks to Maine's terrestrial ecosystems from development and forest management practices.
Terrestrial ecosystems are upland areas such as forests, fields, sand dunes, mountains, riparian areas and other non-wetland ecosystems that serve as habitat for plants and animals.
Issues addressed by the technical working groups under Maine's Built and Natural Landscape (Patterns of Development) are closely related to Terrestrial Ecosystems and are discussed here and in other appropriate issue areas.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that risks from the physical alteration and destruction of Maine's terrestrial ecosystems is high relative to the other issues considered.
This ranking is based on: * the ecological value of Maine's biodiversity, * the linkage between the health of terrestrial ecosystems and that of aquatic ecosystems, * the importance of terrestrial ecosystems to Maine's way of life and natural resource based economy, and * the magnitude of development pressure, especially in sensitive areas.
The Steering Committee concluded that patterns of development throughout southern and coastal Maine and in riparian zones statewide seriously threaten some species and some rare and critical habitats as well as the overall productivity of Maine's terrestrial ecosystems.
The Steering Committee also concluded that degradation of terrestrial ecosystems is seriously impacting the health of freshwater and marine ecosystems, since water bodies are greatly affected by activities within their watersheds.
The spreading pattern of development was determined by the Steering Committee to significantly reduce the quality of life and negatively impact the traditional character of Maine.
The Steering Committee was not able to reach consensus on the level of impact of forest management practices on the health of terrestrial ecosystems.
Discussion:
Maine is located in a major transitional area between warmer, temperate zones to the south and much colder, boreal zones to the north.
Maine's steep climatic gradients are reflected in the diversity of plant and animal species and ecosystem types found within the state.
Because many species are at the limit of their ranges in Maine, Maine's biodiversity is particularly significant from an ecological perspective, and, in some ways, more vulnerable to disturbance.
Currently, approximately 10%, or 155, of Maine's native plant species occur at fewer than five locations within the state and are considered threatened or endangered in this state.
There are approximately fifteen species of terrestrial wildlife listed as either threatened, endangered or of "special concern" at the state level.
Eighteen of Maine's terrestrial community types, assemblages of plants and animals, are considered rare.
Historic losses include approximately 30 plant species, 5 bird species, 5 mammal species including the eastern cougar and woodland caribou, high flood plain forests, and millions of acres of old growth forest.
Ecology: Human induced change may alter natural landscapes through habitat loss due to conversion (e.g. filling or paving of wetlands); habitat fragmentation (e.g. the chopping up of large areas into smaller areas through activities such as road construction); and habitat degradation or simplification (e.g. change to a single age class of species).
By changing the amount and type of habitat available to wildlife, human-induced change can result in the loss of species or a change in the relative abundance of species thus affecting the function and value of ecosystems.
The Steering Committee concluded that the single most significant threat to terrestrial ecosystems is the cumulative loss of undeveloped land to human habitation and commercial development.
This loss has been fueled, in part, by rising population, but, more importantly, by the pattern of development.
Previously rural areas are being converted to suburban residential and commercial use in a spread out pattern sometimes referred to as "sprawl".
The increasing development of shoreland along most lakes is also having a negative impact on the quality and availability of riparian habitat for wildlife.
Indicators of development pressure include the following: * A report by the Commission on Maine's Future documented that since the mid-1960's, nearly 3,600 more people a year moved to Maine than left the state.
* The population in nine municipalities in southern Maine increased 64% between 1970 and 1985.
* Between 1960 and 1980 small towns in Maine (population between 2,500 and 10,000) doubled their share of the state population from one fifth to two fifths.
* The number of persons per household has gotten smaller; from 3.3 people per household in 1960 to 2.6 in 1987.
From 1960 to 1987 Maine added about 212,000 people and 173,000 new homes; four new homes were built for every five new people in Maine.
* From 1980 to 1990 there was a 60% increase in vehicle miles traveled in Maine creating a greater demand for roads.
* The demand for seasonal housing is expected to increase in the next decade.
A study projects a growth of 2,900 to 3,450 new year-round and seasonal units is projected for Maine's unorganized territories during the 1990's.
The Steering Committee determined that these pressures are causing habitat destruction, habitat fragmentation, and habitat degradation.
Terrestrial ecosystem loss and fragmentation is greatest in southern Maine, but is occurring statewide with riparian or shoreland areas under the greatest pressure in all parts of the state.
There is also concern for the fragility of high altitude areas.
Riparian areas are transitional zones between wetlands and terrestrial vegetative types.
These areas make up the smallest percentage of land area, but are one of the most dynamic and sensitive portions of the landscape because they contain valuable water resources, plant communities, fisheries, and wildlife.
Development and associated activities can degrade water quality and displace many bird species from preferred riparian habitats and negatively impact mammal species richness and abundance.
Studies also demonstrate that excessive removal of forest cover in riparian areas can degrade water quality which, in turn, negatively impacts invertebrates, fish, and wildlife within aquatic habitats, particularly headwater streams.
Indicators of the impact of development include songbird population declines associated with diminishing interior habitat and predation from domestic animals; loss of sand dune habitat and declines in least tern and piping plover populations; and populations of rare amphibians in southern Maine threatened by the loss of small wetlands.
Many of the impacts associated with development are, for all practical purposes, irreversible.
Recovery from absolute loss of habitat is zero.
Recovery of degraded ecosystems may take a century or more.
Additionally much development is incremental in nature.
Each action may not in itself be overly damaging to terrestrial ecosystems, but, when taken together, the cumulative effect is large and permanent.
Few, if any, regulations specifically target the protection of upland species and their habitats.
The Steering Committee concluded that the Growth Management Law, an effort to plan for development, does not appear to be protecting terrestrial ecosystems in its current, voluntary form.
There was no consensus on the magnitude of the risk to terrestrial ecosystems from forest practices.
Steering Committee members differed on their assessments of the magnitude of the risk; however, all members recognize the importance of sustainable forest practices.
Some Steering Committee members expressed concern that simplification is an ecological issue for Maine's vast forest lands.
Simplification is a loss of complex ecological structures and ecosystem functions, including impacts such as the narrowing of tree species present; conversion to single age class stands; and the disruption of normal aging processes, decomposition, and soil processes within stands.
Members were mindful of the on-going efforts by the Maine Forest Sustainability Council and a collaborative effort by landowners, state agencies, conservation organizations, and others called the Biodiversity Project to assess the risks from forest management to terrestrial ecosystems and to propose solutions if needed.
Quality of Life: The risk to quality of life from spreading patterns of development was a contributing factor to the high risk ranking assigned to terrestrial ecosystems by the Steering Committee.
Urban sprawl with the accompanying deterioration of downtowns, loss of small town centers, and loss of rural character has a negative visual impact on most people.
The accompanying traffic congestion, development along roadsides, loss of historic buildings, and loss of natural vistas also negatively impact our peace of mind, sense of place and the traditional character of Maine.
The dispersed patterns of settlement also diminish sense of naturalness and limit our access to wild or undeveloped areas that have become private, restricted, or developed.
The Steering Committee did not reach consensus on the risks to quality of life from forest harvesting practices.
A variety of comments were received from the public regarding forest management practices including comments on quality of life impacts on aesthetics, peace of mind and the economy.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank7.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This section discusses risks posed by potential climate changes caused by human activity, especially the build-up of carbon dioxide and other "greenhouse" gasses in the atmosphere.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that, compared to other environmental risks facing Maine, global climate change induced by human activity represents a medium risk, due to the potential for major changes to Maine's ecological systems from a warming of the earth's atmosphere and the attendant potential consequences to Mainers' health and quality of life.
The following reasons lead to this conclusion: * There is a growing consensus in the world scientific community, as evidenced in the recent updated report of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (the group of 500 scientists appointed by the nations of the world to study this issue on an ongoing basis), that human-caused global warming is occurring.
* At least three models of the impacts from global warming on New England are predicting major ecological change.
Although the Steering Committee understands that each of these models is limited in its predictive ability, the Steering Committee believes that the weight of the evidence is showing that a warming of Maine's climate would result in a natural world very different from that of the present.
* However, because the Steering Committee also understands that it is difficult to predict with any degree of confidence what the exact impacts on Maine will be and when they will occur, due to the complexity of the issue and the problems currently associated with predicting precise impacts from such a global change on an area as relatively small as Maine, the Steering Committee concluded that global climate change represents a medium risk compared to other risks facing Maine.
* The Steering Committee recognizes that global climate change appears to be a low environmental concern among most Mainers.
The Committee believes that this relatively low level of concern may be due to the lack of immediate, tangible impacts associated with this issue as compared with other environmental problems facing Maine.
Discussion:
Climate is the pattern of temperatures, precipitation, cloud cover and short term weather events such as storms.
Climate, both averages and extremes, has helped determine the fundamental character of Maine's environment.
Human induced climate change is linked to emissions of greenhouse gasses including carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, and chlorofluorocarbons.
These gasses enhance the greenhouse effect, a natural phenomenon which keeps heat from the sun trapped near the earth.
Climate can also be affected by land use changes such as urbanization and forest clearing.
Climate change scenarios developed by three models (Canadian Climate Centre, Geophysical Fluids Dynamic Laboratory, United Kingdom Meteorological Office) suggest that in an atmosphere with a heat absorbing capacity equivalent to twice the current level of CO2, New England's climate could experience the following changes: * winter and summer temperatures could increase 2 to 7 degrees Fahrenheit by the year 2100; * winter precipitation could increase; * summer precipitation could decrease; * summer soil moisture could decrease.
Climate change and the rate of such change may have profound implications for forests, water bodies, fisheries, agriculture, the coastline, weather, and other natural features of the state and may have significant ramifications for human health and our quality of life.
Ecology: Although ecosystems are constantly changing and adapting to new situations, the rate and geographic scale of the change is critical to the ability of species to adapt and survive.
Because Maine is located on the southern edge of colder zones and the northern edge of warmer zones, its biodiversity is particularly significant and vulnerable.
The temperature and precipitation changes noted above could result in the following types of ecological changes in Maine: * shift from a spruce-fir boreal forest to hardwood and white pine temperate forest; * increased problems from insect pests and plant disease; * increased fire incidence; * increased summer drought and the need for irrigation of agricultural crops; * stronger storms and greater extremes in weather; * shifts from cold water to cool and warm water freshwater fisheries; * shifts in migration and the location of feeding and spawning areas for marine fisheries; * loss of coastal marshes due to sea-level rise; * increased rates of coastal erosion; * loss of coastal wetlands could affect the composition of and reduce the abundance of commercial fisheries; * increased problems from marine parasites and algae blooms due to warmer ocean waters; and * shifts in salinity of sensitive coastal aquifers.
In addition to the potential for shifts in ecosystem types and relative abundance of species, there is also the potential for large scale species loss.
As noted above, the ability of natural systems to adjust to temperature increases will depend to a large extent upon the rate of change.
Although temperature and precipitation have always been highly variable, the averages are generally thought to change slowly on a scale of thousands of years.
However, recent evidence suggests that climate can change more rapidly than previously thought, on a scale of a decade or less.
There is the possibility that climate may change faster in the next century than at any other time in human history.
Climate could change faster than ecosystems are able to adjust, especially where habitat loss, degradation, and fragmentation are so extensive that species cannot find or get to alternative habitat.
Human Health: The human health technical working group did not submit a report on this issue; therefore, the Steering Committee had little information on the potential human health effects associated with global climate change.
The Steering Committee noted the possibility of an increase in the incidence of diseases typically associated with warmer climates as well as potential impacts on food and water supplies.
Quality of Life: Little information was available for the Steering Committee's consideration.
The Steering Committee concluded that the implications for quality of life will depend in large part upon the rate of climate change.
If change occurs slowly, ecosystems and related economies will have an opportunity to adapt.
However, rapid climate change could have a severe negative impact on Maine's natural resource based economy leading to major economic dislocations.
In addition, increasingly severe storms with coastal flooding and erosion and a rise in sea level could have potentially significant negative economic effects including extensive loss of or damage to property.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank8.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue focuses on the risks to soils and soil organisms from exposure to chemical agents including pesticides introduced by human activities and risks to plants, animals, and humans that come in contact with contaminated soils.
The Steering Committee also chose to include in this issue risks to agricultural workers from exposure to pesticides.
The issue also examines the loss of farms and farmland due to abandonment, development, and erosion.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that, compared with the other issues ranked, certain threats to Land and Agricultural Resources pose a medium risk to ecological systems, human health, and quality of life.
Factors leading to the ranking include: concerns about the cumulative effects from the intentional application of pesticides to crops, the atmospheric deposition of metals and other contaminants, and the general lack of information on the effects of such contaminants on soil ecology.
From a human health perspective, the accumulation of lead in soils near structures due to lead based paint, farm worker exposure to pesticides and pesticide residue on food contributed to the overall ranking.
There was no consensus on the risk from the land application of sludge and residuals.
The Steering Committee also discussed at length the impacts associated with the patterns of human development including its relationship to the loss of farms and farmland.
The Steering Committee concluded that the loss of prime agricultural land to residential and commercial development has had a negative impact on our quality of life and represents the loss of a critical resource for current and future generations.
Discussion:
Soils are critical to the health of our terrestrial ecosystems.
They provide support and nutrients for plant growth and play an important role in the decomposition of organic matter and the cycling of nutrients.
Depending upon the specific characteristics of the soil, soils can either retain contaminants and water (as do clay soils) or allow them to pass quickly through to other soil layers or the water table (as sand and gravel do).
Contaminants in soils can be transferred to ground water, surface water, and the air where they can pose additional risks.
Ecology: The Steering Committee is concerned about the general lack of information on the ecological effects associated with the contamination of soils.
There is currently no comprehensive statewide monitoring and assessment of Maine's soil resources to determine what chemicals, if any, are being deposited there, the length of time chemicals may remain in the soil, or the nature and degree of impact they may have on soil ecology.
This general lack of scientific information contributed to the overall ranking but also made assessment of specific risks difficult.
The Steering Committee did not reach consensus on the relative importance of risks to ecological systems from specific human activities.
The Committee, however, noted the following:
Air pollution: The ecological working group expressed concern about the atmospheric transport and deposition of nitrogen and mercury on soils.
While nitrogen is an essential plant nutrient, elevated levels are known to alter the growth and functioning of organisms as well as the nutrient dynamics of ecosystems.
In some instances Maine soils may be becoming saturated with nitrogen, resulting in the leaching of nitrogen to ground water.
Nitrogen contributes to the acidification of soils, although no clear effects on soil fertility or acidity have been detected in Maine or elsewhere.
Mercury, in the form of methyl mercury, is of concern because it is easily transported into aquatic environments.
It is highly toxic, bioaccumulates in the food chain, and has been documented in lake fish statewide.
Pesticides: Pesticides are used statewide on agricultural crops, forest lands, road and railway rights of way, golf courses, lawns, and public spaces.
Most pesticides licensed for use today are thought to break down quickly in the environment; however, there is no long term monitoring taking place in Maine to assess their fate, and information about trends in soil impacts and ecosystem level impacts are not well understood.
There is some concern among scientists and the general public for adverse impacts from current pesticide use on Maine's blueberry barrens.
When used to remove competing vegetation, pesticides can contribute to soil erosion by killing protective ground cover.
While older, more persistent pesticides are no longer being sold, they are still being found in the environment.
These persistent pesticides are known to cause reproductive failure in higher order predators such as eagles.
Sludge and Residuals: A number of organic wastes produced in Maine are being composted and/or directly applied to land.
While limits are placed on contaminant levels and application of sludge and residuals is regulated by the state to control the potential for adverse environmental effects, actual monitoring of application sites is limited.
Human Health: The Steering Committee concluded that the primary concerns from a human health perspective are the presence of lead in the soils around structures, the exposure of agricultural workers to pesticides in the field and pesticide residues on food.
There was no consensus on the risk from the land application of sludge and residuals.
Lead: Direct releases to soil occur from peeling and flaking paint, industrial processes, and waste disposal are all matters of concern.
Air pollution was a major contributor to soil lead levels in the past due to the use of leaded gasoline.
Since most of the lead is retained in the top 1 - 2 inches of soil, it can remain in place for years after deposition has stopped.
Young children playing in soils around homes or in playgrounds can ingest contaminated soil.
They are also likely to transport contaminated soils indoors.
Children under 6 years of age are most sensitive to lead exposure because of their developing nervous system.
80 to 85% of Maine's housing was built before 1960 when the use of lead-based paint was common.
40-50% of Maine's housing was constructed prior to 1940 when lead content in some paints was nearly 50%.
The potential for the exposure of children to lead contaminated soils is high.
Exposure of Workers to Pesticides: The potential for exposure to pesticides is an important problem for farm workers and their families.
Agriculture accounts for nearly 90% of Maine's pesticide use (accounted for by active ingredient).
In 1993 there were approximately 19,000 migrant and seasonal farm workers and their dependents and more than 900 trained pesticide handlers.
Together, these populations comprise a potential population at risk in Maine of about 20,000 individuals.
Exposure to pesticides in the field has been a historic problem.
A 1990 study of migrant labor in western New York found that 40% of children who had been in fields had encountered crops still wet with pesticide spray and that an equal percentage had actually been sprayed while in the fields.
Risks associated with this exposure are now regulated under the EPA's Worker Protections Standards Act adopted in 1992 so risks may be declining.
The actual incidence of disease resulting from exposure to pesticides is unknown.
Only 2 cases of pesticide poisoning were reported to the Maine Department of Human Services from 1986 to 1993; however, under-reporting is thought to be widespread.
Pesticide Residues on Food: Pesticide residues on food contribute to the medium ranking of this issue area because of the potential for important health effects and the large uncertainties regarding exposure and impacts to children.
Potential health effects vary with the pesticide involved, but include both cancer and non-cancer effects such as nervous system effects and hormonal effects.
Studies of different foods show that a significant proportion of produce in the U.S. has detectable levels of pesticide residues.
A recent U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) study found pesticide residues on 40% of domestic samples and 36% of imported samples.
Although fewer than 1% of both domestic and imported samples had residues that exceeded acceptable limits; data is very limited.
In addition, the FDA's pesticides monitoring program has been repeatedly characterized as inadequate by the U.S. Government Accounting Office, especially as it relates to assessing the risks to infants and children.
Limited market basket studies in Maine from 1990 to 1992 revealed pesticide residues on some samples, but none in excess of federally established standards.
State sampling has been curtailed due to lack of funds.
Neither the state nor the federal government currently devote resources to annual, standardized monitoring and risk characterization.
Concerns about the adequacy of current monitoring programs added to the ranking of this issue area.
Land Application of Sludge and Residuals: The Steering Committee noted that the Department of Environmental Protection regulates the land application of sludge and residuals to limit the potential for human exposure to pathogens, chlorinated organic compounds, and other potentially harmful contaminants.
There was disagreement among Committee members on the adequacy of the existing regulations with some members noting that the human health working group expressed concern that sludge containing less than 28 parts per trillion dioxin (TCDD) may be applied to land without restriction.
Quality of Life: The review of quality of life impacts includes consideration of both the effects of chemical contamination of land and the impacts associated with the loss of farms and farmland.
The Steering Committee acknowledges the public concern over the use of pesticides, pesticide residues on food and the land application of sludge and residuals.
Pesticide use poses disproportionate toxicological risks to agricultural workers, those living in the vicinity of spray areas, and disproportionate risks to children who may be more susceptible than adults.
Exposure to lead contaminated soils poses significant threats to children and future generations.
The land application of sludge and residuals, if not properly handled, may have a significant impact on peace of mind.
The Steering Committee noted the potential for variability in the quality of municipal treatment plant sludge due to limitations on the ability of systems to control what is dumped down the drain.
The Steering Committee also concluded that through a cumulative process of abandonment and development, much prime farmland is being permanently lost in Maine.
About half of Maine's farmland is located in the Interstate 95 corridor, and 55% of good farmland soils are located in Cumberland County, making it highly vulnerable to development.
From 1960 to 1980 southern Maine counties lost farmland to development at twice the state average.
During this period, 67% of all housing and commercial development was built on prime agricultural soils.
In addition, during the period from 1982 to 1992, the number of farms decreased 18% from 7,003 to 5,776; the number of dairy farms 54%, from 1,784 to 836; poultry farms 49%, from 145 to 74; and potato farms 32%, from 1,134 to 770.
This loss was due, in part, to the low profitability of farming and our changing patterns of human settlement.
The loss of agricultural land and farms has had a negative impact on quality of life.
The loss of open space has visual impacts affecting the traditional character of Maine and restricts recreational opportunities.
The loss of farms also diminishes our food security and, for some, impacts one's sense of independence and peace of mind.
The loss of farms also means the loss of a way of life and the potential loss of future generations due to insufficient economic opportunity.
Counties with the largest agricultural sectors have the highest percentage of people who say they expect to move away from Maine: 28% of Waldo County residents, 18% of Aroostook County, compared with 9% statewide.
There is a danger that a critical number of farms will be lost, industries serving agriculture will be lost, and agriculture's viability as an industry in Maine imperiled.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank9.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue addresses municipal solid waste, special wastes and hazardous wastes.
Municipal solid waste is trash generated by households and businesses and includes wastes such as plastic, paper, glass, metal, food wastes, and bulky items such as tires and appliances.
Special wastes are wastes that require special handling because of their chemical and physical properties and include items such as sludge, incinerator ash, asbestos, and other industrial by-products.
Hazardous wastes include certain listed chemicals; wastes from certain industrial processes; and wastes that are corrosive, reactive in the presence of water, ignitable, toxic or leach certain pollutants.
Risks posed by current and past levels of waste generation and by waste management practices are examined with a focus on risks from old dumps, unlicensed landfills, and uncontrolled hazardous substance sites.
Risks associated with the land application of solid waste and residuals are addressed in Land and Agricultural Resources.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that solid, special, and hazardous waste generation and management currently pose a medium level of risk relative to the other issues ranked.
While the state has made notable gains in addressing these risks, important concerns remain.
The medium ranking was based on the assumption that existing programs to encourage toxics use reduction and waste reduction and to address currently contaminated sites would be carried to completion.
More than two hundred municipal landfills still must be closed, with an estimated cost of capping at over $119 million.
As long as these sites remain uncapped, they pose unnecessary risks, especially to human health.
While not impacting as many people, hazardous wastes found at both Superfund and some RCRA (Resource Conservation and Recovery Act) sites pose unique threats to people living in the vicinity of these sites.
While contamination of drinking water is the major human health concern, contamination of soils and air are also important factors.
Uncontrolled hazardous waste sites may also pose immediate health and safety problems for people in the vicinity of the site due to the presence of concentrated and unconfined wastes.
Although the general population bears some of the economic costs associated with the poor waste management practices of the past, both economic costs and risks to health and quality of life risks are disproportionately high and frequently involuntary for those living in the vicinity of waste sites.
Failure to close old dumps or clean up uncontrolled hazardous waste sites will allow contamination to spread, and will transfer both health and environmental risks and economic costs to future generations.
With respect to current levels of waste generation and current management practices, the Steering Committee acknowledges the high degree of regulation in the solid, special, and hazardous waste areas, but notes that prevention is far more cost effective than remediation.
Recycling of materials such as metals, plastics, and batteries reduces the amount of material burned at waste incinerators thus reducing the emission of air toxics, heavy metals and other pollutants that may pose threats to human health and ecological systems.
Additionally, Maine's Toxic Use and Hazardous Waste Reduction Act has led to decreases in toxics use, toxics released, and hazardous waste generation.
The goal of a 20% reduction by January 1, 1996 in toxics released and hazardous waste generated has been achieved, and progress toward further reduction goals is being made.
Discussion:
Before 1970 there was little government control over the storage, handling, and disposal of solid, special, or hazardous wastes.
Many wastes were disposed in unlined lagoons, leach fields, dumps, or placed directly on the ground in any convenient location.
In response to the resulting public health and environmental problems caused by such actions, laws were enacted to control waste management and to clean up contaminated sites.
The following figures reflect recent waste generation and management in Maine.
* In 1993, Maine generated 1.29 million tons of municipal solid waste.
About 36% was incinerated, 33% recycled, 28% landfilled, and 3% sent out-of-state.
Approximately 370 of Maine's 500 towns had recycling programs.
* Special wastes including incinerator ash, sludge, asbestos and industrial by-products amounted to 1.9 million tons in 1991.
Of this amount, 64% was landfilled, 16% incinerated, 13% landspread, 3% reused or recycled, 3% composted, and 1% shipped out-of-state.
* There are currently about 3000 RCRA facilities (businesses, industries, institutions that generate and handle hazardous waste) in Maine.
In 1991, these sites shipped 13,600 tons of hazardous waste out-of-state and managed 10,230 tons on the site of generation.
In addition to regulating current waste generation and management, the state is also involved in the clean up of old waste sites.
In the early 1970's there were 455 municipal solid waste disposal facilities in operation.
Many of these have been closed; more than 200 are awaiting closure.
A total of 419 potential hazardous substance sites have been identified since 1983.
Of these 134 are awaiting clean-up or are in the process of being cleaned up.
There are also on- going clean-up actions at 46 RCRA facilities.
Ecology: With respect to impacts on wildlife, very little work has been done nationally or in Maine to assess risk from old waste sites.
There is some indication that contaminants at the major uncontrolled hazardous substance sites in Maine may be having negative impacts on both terrestrial and aquatic plants and animals.
However, unless the site is discharging to a surface water body, impacts appear to be confined to the immediate vicinity of the site.
Human Health: The primary risk to human health from old dumps and unlicensed solid waste landfills is contamination of ground water and subsequent contamination of domestic drinking water supplies.
The buildup of toxic and explosive gases in confined spaces, such as the basements of buildings adjacent to the sites, is a concern in some instances.
Hazardous waste sites pose two general types of problems: first, the potential for direct contact with chemicals or concentrated wastes at the site, and second, problems caused by the chemical contamination of the air, land, ground water, and surface water in the vicinity of the site.
Significant health risks have been documented at the major Superfund sites in Maine and at several RCRA facilities.
Actual human exposure is limited by emergency actions taken to prevent unauthorized access to the sites or the consumption of contaminated water in the vicinity of the sites.
More than 200 private wells have been abandoned due to contamination or because they are in the path of a contaminated ground water plume.
Quality of Life: The Steering Committee acknowledges the high public concern associated with the management of solid, special, and hazardous waste streams.
Much of this concern is associated with the fear of contamination, especially the loss of drinking water supplies, and is evident in the difficulty of siting new facilities or expanding old facilities.
People do not want waste facilities in their neighborhoods and feel that any siting initiative is inherently unfair to someone.
Efforts to close landfills and clean up waste sites are supported by the general public.
To date (November 1995), 7 of 8 landfill closure and remediation bonds totaling $59 million have been approved by Maine voters.
Since 1983, $15,234,000 has been approved for the clean-up of uncontrolled hazardous substance sites.
Additionally, current high disposal costs argue for continued efforts at waste reduction, recycling, and composting.
Municipal solid waste disposal costs average $35 to $40 per ton and range from $28 to $170 per ton.
Municipal solid waste costs amount to approximately 4.3 % of the average municipal budget in Maine.
Special waste disposal costs range from $45 to $70 per ton at commercial landfills.
Hazardous waste costs range from $270 to $420 per 55 gallon drum plus transportation costs.
The economic benefits from the sale of recycled materials have continued to improve even as disposal costs increase.
Recycling of solid and special waste reduces the need for expensive disposal facilities.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank10.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue discusses the phenomenon of stratospheric ozone depletion and the potential impacts of the associated increase in ultraviolet radiation on human health, ecological systems, and quality of life.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that, compared with other issues, stratospheric ozone depletion poses a medium level of risk to human health, ecological systems, and quality of life in Maine.
This medium rating was based in large part upon the fact that steps have been taken to phase out the use of ozone depleting compounds.
If these steps continue to be implemented, stratospheric ozone is expected to return to normal levels within 60 to 120 years.
However, especially at the international level, there are implementation problems that need to be followed closely.
Discussion:
The stratospheric ozone layer is a shield against excessive ultraviolet radiation and, as such, is critical to the earth's ability to support life.
Until recently, ozone depleting compounds, including chlorofluorocarbons, were widely used as refrigerants, solvents, and aerosol propellants.
Following discovery in 1985 of a hole in the stratospheric ozone layer, 24 countries and the European Economic Community signed the Montreal Protocol on Substances that Deplete the Ozone Layer in 1987.
The Montreal Protocol created a timeline for the phase out of the production and use of ozone depleting chemicals.
The Protocol was amended in 1994 to completely phase out the most damaging compounds by 1996.
However, there are currently efforts in the U.S. Congress to have the United States withdraw from this agreement.
Although initially discovered at the poles, a thinning of the ozone layer has been documented at mid latitudes.
A stratospheric ozone monitoring station located in Caribou, Maine recorded deficits of up to 18% over Maine in January 1993.
Unusually low values were also recorded during the summer of 1993.
Research is currently underway internationally to correlate ozone deficits with increases in ultraviolet-b (UV-b) light reaching the earth's surface; and changes in incident UV-b, with human health and ecological effects.
Ecology: The scientific community remains uncertain about the magnitude of the effect of increased ultraviolet exposure on ecosystems; however, research is ongoing in several areas.
Scientists in Maine and elsewhere are investigating the effects of ultraviolet light on marine organisms including phytoplankton.
Phytoplankton are minute organisms that form the base of the entire marine food chain.
Increases in ultraviolet light may have negative impacts on photosynthesis, nitrogen metabolism, locomotion, and the growth rate of phytoplankton.
Serious disruption of phytoplankton populations would have a ripple effect throughout the marine ecosystem with adverse consequences for Maine's marine fisheries.
Additionally scientists are investigating the possibility of a link between increases in ultraviolet light and the observed declines in amphibian populations worldwide.
Laboratory studies have also found some evidence that decreases in crop yields are associated with increases in exposure to ultraviolet light.
Human Health: Exposure to ultraviolet-b light, as well as overexposure to sunlight, is known to cause the following health effects in humans: an increase in non melanoma skin tumors, an increase in malignant skin tumors, an increase in eye disorders and cataracts, and a decrease in immune system function.
Radiation from the ultraviolet-b range is thought to be the primary environmental factor leading to non-melanoma skin cancer.
Levels of UV-b commonly received by human populations cause suppression of the human immune system.
While the relationship between exposure to ultraviolet-b radiation and the health effects listed above is well documented, there is no Maine data correlating decreases in stratospheric ozone and increases in UV-b light with increased incidence of disease.
Quality of Life: Risks to natural systems from stratospheric ozone depletion could have potentially negative effects on Maine's natural resource based industries such as fisheries, agriculture, forestry, and tourism.
There are also real but unquantified economic losses associated with the potential increase in the incidence of skin cancers, cataracts, and decreased immune system function.
Additionally, the growing concern about exposure to sunlight can negatively affect our peace of mind and our enjoyment of the out-of-doors.
Weather reports in Maine now routinely present information about ultraviolet light exposure during the summer months with the caution to protect against exposure to the sun.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank11.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: Ground water is water that is contained in fractured rock and sand, gravel, and other soil layers beneath the earth's surface.
This issue addresses the degree of risk posed to wildlife and plant life in Maine from contaminated ground water and the risk to human health from the use of contaminated ground water to irrigate crops.
The degree of health risk to Maine people from contaminated ground water used for drinking water or for other domestic uses is addressed in the discussion of Drinking Water and Domestic Use Water.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that contamination of ground water poses a low risk compared to other issues ranked.
Ground water and surface water are interconnected, with almost all ground water in Maine ultimately discharging to a surface water body.
Contamination of ground water will therefore ultimately affect surface water.
Discussion:
Ecology: The primary ecological issue associated with contaminated ground water involves the potential for contaminants to be discharged from ground water to surface water bodies.
Nutrients are the primary contaminants of concern based upon current available information.
Given the limited data on this topic, the Steering Committee relied upon its best judgment in concluding that, in terms of magnitude, chemical contamination to ground water affecting wildlife does not appear to be a significant issue as compared to chemical contamination of lakes, rivers, and estuaries.
The major sources of nutrient contamination include septic systems and manure storage piles.
Lakes, ponds, and other standing water systems are the most vulnerable to nutrient loading from ground water.
An estimate of the amount of surface water adversely affected from ground water nutrient loading is unknown.
The Steering Committee considered the ecological risks from nutrient loading to surface waters in its ranking of the Surface Waters and Sediments issue.
Human Health: The primary ways in which people are exposed to contaminants in ground water include: ingestion of contaminated drinking water, absorption of contaminants through the skin during washing, and inhalation of contaminants such as radon gas that volatilize from the water into the air during water use.
These risks are considered in the issue areas of Drinking Water and Domestic Use Water and Indoor Air.
The potential risk to human health through use of contaminated ground water for irrigation of crops was identified by the Steering Committee but there was inadequate information from which the Steering Committee could assess the level of any such risk.
Quality of Life: As discussed in the quality of life section under Drinking Water and Domestic Use Water, the Steering Committee noted that the public is very concerned about threats to ground water and risks from contaminated drinking water.
Once contaminated, it is extremely difficult, if not impossible, to restore supplies to drinking water standards.
In addition to concern about ground water as a source of drinking water, the public perception is that clean water for whatever use, is an important and finite resource that is fundamental to quality of life in Maine now and in the future.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank12.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue discusses risks associated with nuclear or radioactive waste generation and management.
Risks associated with naturally occurring radon are addressed under Indoor Air.
Summary Statement:
The Steering Committee concluded that radiation, especially from power generation and from the management of low- level and high-level radioactive waste currently poses a low risk compared to other environmental risks facing Maine.
The primary factors determining a low level of risk were: the relative safety, historically, of the day to day operations of Maine Yankee and the high degree of regulation of the nuclear industry.
The potential for a catastrophic accident related to plant operations or the disposal of high level waste was a concern for some Steering Committee members, but this factor was not incorporated into the ranking decision.
While the Committee concurred on a low overall risk, the group also agreed on the need for continued surveillance and re-evaluation of the risk as the Maine Yankee facility approaches the end of its license and decommissioning.
This issue also included a discussion of risks from electromagnetic fields.
The human health technical working group concluded that data on such effects are contradictory and inconclusive and that there is no consensus in the scientific community on this issue.
The Steering Committee therefore did not consider electromagnetic fields in its ranking of this issue area.
Discussion:
Radiation can be grouped into two distinct classes: ionizing and non-ionizing radiation.
The differentiation is based on the higher energy level of ionizing radiation and its greater potential to alter chemical bonds of biological significance.
Ionizing radiation is known to cause an increased risk of cancer in humans.
Exposure is most often associated with natural sources of radioactivity, not human activities such as nuclear power production.
Significant natural sources include elements in the earth (uranium and radium), cosmic and solar radiation, and radon.
Human activities that create potential exposure are power generation and medical treatment, including x-rays and nuclear medicine.
Ecology: The Steering Committee did not have sufficient data available on which to review potential ecological impacts of Maine Yankee operations.
The Committee's ranking was primarily based on the extent of risk posed by radiation to human health and quality of life.
Human Health: The Steering Committee considered risks from the operation of the Maine Yankee Nuclear Power Plant and risks from both low-level and high-level radioactive waste management including transportation and short and long-term storage.
Cancer is the principal health risk associated with day to day exposure to low levels of radiation.
Epidemiological studies show that the risk of developing cancer from ionizing radiation is proportional to the dose received; the higher the dose, the greater the risk.
The dose from all sources of ionizing radiation are considered to be cumulative over an individual's lifetime.
Nuclear power generation: Since the start of operation in December 1972, Maine Yankee has emitted low- levels of radioactivity into the environment as part of its routine operations.
The atmospheric releases are regularly monitored through a system of remote radiation monitors installed within a 1 mile radius of the plant by the State Environmental Monitoring Network.
The Maine Department of Human Services Division of Health Engineering routinely collects samples of fresh water, salt water, seaweed, vegetation, milk, fish, sediments, and air to test for radioactivity.
Though trace radionuclides attributable to Mane Yankee were found in 1993-1994, no levels in excess of standards were detected.
The population potentially exposed to releases from the Maine Yankee facility is generally considered to be those living within a 50 mile radius of the plant, roughly 800,000 people.
The risk from actual releases has been less than a 1 in 20 million annual increased risk of cancer based on 1993 releases (assuming the entire population of concern living at the site boundary).
The increased risk based upon the maximum annual release since 1988 is 1 in 5 million.
Low-level Radioactive Waste: Low level radioactive waste is generated by four basic groups of radioactive materials users: nuclear power plants, academic and medical facilities, industry, and government.
In Maine, each year between 40 and 52 facilities report the generation of low-level waste.
The majority of this waste is generated by Maine Yankee.
In 1992, 59.4% of Maine's low-level waste measured by volume and 99.4% measured by radiation levels, came from Maine Yankee.
Low-level waste generation in Maine generally has declined from 1978 to 1992.
Maine has entered into a compact with Texas to ship low-level waste to a disposal facility being built in Texas and scheduled to open in 1997.
In the interim, Maine Yankee is shipping low-level waste to a facility in South Carolina.
From 1971 to 1980, there were approximately 10 accidents per year nationwide involving the transportation and handling of low-level radioactive waste.
In no case was radioactive material released at levels sufficient to present a public health threat.
The maximally exposed individual (drivers and handlers of the material) theoretically receives about 20 millirems per year; however, there are no specific studies in Maine to validate these dose estimates.
High Level Radioactive Waste: The federal government is responsible for the safe disposal of high-level waste.
Seven hundred fifty tons of "spent fuel" are currently stored on site at Maine Yankee.
Maine Yankee's spent fuel will continue to be stored on site until being moved to a federal repository scheduled to open at Yucca Mountain, Nevada in 2010.
High level waste is also stored at Portsmouth Naval Shipyard in Kittery.
Quality of Life: The Steering Committee recognizes that nuclear waste generation and management has a significant impact on peace of mind for a substantial number of people.
Concern over the safe disposal of radioactive waste was among the most frequently mentioned issues in the MEPP survey in 1994.
However, radiation was given a low ranking in MEPP roundtable discussions and in a survey of roundtable participants conducted in the fall of 1995.
The reasons for this discrepancy are unclear.
Maine Yankee has been the subject of three hard-fought public referenda in the past.
The referenda showed that the majority of Maine people want to see the plant continue to operate, but there is a sizable minority who strongly wish to see the plant closed.
Recent developments regarding cracked tubes at Maine Yankee have raised new concerns regarding the safety of the plant and renewed the public debate on the benefits and risks associated with nuclear power.
The Steering Committee emphasizes the need for continued oversight and a reassessment of risks as Maine Yankee approaches closure and decommissioning.
The availability of repositories to handle radioactive wastes generated at decommissioning is a critical public concern.
As of December 1995, new issues regarding the operation of Maine Yankee have emerged; however, these were not considered in the ranking decision.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank13.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue examines the risks from exposure to chemicals in the work place, with a focus on exposures in industrial settings and service sector businesses such as body shops and dry cleaning establishments.
The exposure of agricultural workers to pesticides is discussed under Land and Agricultural Resources.
Summary Statement
The Steering Committee concluded that the technical report did not provide them with sufficient information to rank the risk associated with worker exposure to toxins.
The human health technical working group was unable to attain, from the state and federal agencies responsible for workplace safety, comprehensive, comparative data on the level of chemical exposures at various work places in Maine.
Subsequent efforts by members of the Steering Committee to obtain this information, including meetings with responsible agency officials, proved unsuccessful.
Steering Committee members were told that the comprehensive, comparative data being sought is not compiled.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank14.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
The Steering Committee considered the significance of food as a critical means of human exposure to environmental contaminants.
With the exception of the conclusion that pesticide residues on food was a medium concern for the Steering Committee, Food Safety was ranked a low environmental risk for Maine people.
After discussing the issue at length, the Steering Committee concluded that the majority of Food Safety information addressed by the technical working groups is considered in other issue areas.
In order to avoid the double counting of risks, the Steering Committee decided to consider Food Safety issues in the discussion of the other appropriate issue areas.
Consequently, the discussion of risks associated with endocrine disrupting chemicals can be found in Outdoor Air and Surface Water and Sediments.
Risks associated with pesticide residues on food can be found in Land and Agricultural Resources.
Risks associated with biological and chemical contamination from combined sewer overflows can be found in Surface Water and Sediments.
Risks associated with mercury contamination of some lake and river fish can be found in Surface Waters and Sediments.
Risks associated with paralytic shellfish poisoning can be found in Freshwater and Marine Ecosystems.
Risks associated with ingestion or drinking of contaminated water can be found in Drinking Water and Domestic Use Water.
The Steering Committee concluded that the post harvest contamination of fresh and incompletely cooked foods by microorganisms such as E. Coli, Salmonella, Cryptosporidium, and Hepatitis A and the contamination of food from packaging, such as lead in the seams of some imported foods - while considered by the Human Health technical working group - were not environmental issues for the purposes of this project.
__________________________________________________________________
[rank15.gif]
Back to Table of Contents
Definition: This issue addresses the risks from the progressive loss of undeveloped land to human habitation and commercial development through a sprawling pattern of development.
Summary Statement
During the initial ranking session, a great deal of Steering Committee discussion centered around the issues affecting Maine's landscape.
During those discussions, it was decided to rename this topic "Patterns of Development".
This issue was addressed separately in the analysis of the quality of life working group, but concerns associated with Maine's patterns of development were integrated into other issue areas by the ecological working group and, to some extent, by the human health working group.
While concluding the risk from patterns of development or sprawl is high, the Steering Committee members determined that, given the wide-ranging ramifications of our patterns of development on issues from outdoor air to ground water contamination to ecosystem degradation to loss of agricultural resources, the impacts from patterns of development were best incorporated into the ranking of these other issue areas.
Steering Committee members also noted that Maine's Built and Natural Landscape, as it was originally addressed by the quality of life technical working group, is of concern to Maine people from a quality of life perspective, independent of its potential for adverse impacts on natural resources, ecosystems, and human health.
__________________________________________________________________
Terms and Abbreviations
Back to Table of Contents
BOD: Biological oxygen demand.
An indirect measure of the concentration of biologically degradable material present in organic wastes.
The amount of oxygen consumed by biological processes breaking down organic wastes.
CFCs: Chlorofluorocarbons.
A group of chemicals that deplete the protective ozone layer.
CSO: Combined sewer overflow.
A pipe that discharges untreated sewage and storm water during storms when the capacity of the wastewater treatment plant cannot handle the increased load.
DEP: Maine Department of Environmental Protection
DHS: Maine Department of Human Services
DNAPLS: Dense non-aqueous phase liquids.
A term used to refer to chlorinated solvents that are heavier than water and that sink through aquifers contaminating ground water.
EPA: United States Environmental Protection Agency
ETS: Environmental tobacco smoke
HAPs: Hazardous air pollutants also known as air toxics, include hundreds of chemicals used in industrial societies.
MTBE: A gasoline additive commonly found in ground water near underground storage tanks.
NOx: Nitrogen oxide.
A product of combustion and a major contributor to the formation of ground level ozone and to acid deposition.
PCBs: Polychlorinated biphenyls.
A group of manufactured chemicals widely used in electrical equipment.
Manufacture was banned in the U.S. in the late 1970s, but some are still in use.
They are suspected of causing cancer.
RCRA: Resource Conservation and Recovery Act.
Superfund: The federal program that funds and carries out EPA solid waste emergency and long-term removal and remedial activities.
THMs: Trihalomethanes.
A group of compounds produced when chlorine interacts with natural organic acids such as those produced when leaves decay.
A relatively common contaminant of chlorinated drinking water.
TRI: Toxic Release Inventory.
A database of toxic releases in the United States.
VOCs: Volatile organic compounds.
Any organic compound that participates in atmospheric photochemical reactions except those designated by EPA as having negligible photochemical reactivity.
__________________________________________________________________
Table of Contents or MEPP Home Page
Maine Environmental Priorities Project
